Hawaii statutes.
CHAPTER
656

FRAUDS,
STATUTE OF

Section

656-1 Certain contracts, when actionable

656-2 Consideration need not be in writing

656-3 Representation of another's credit, etc.,
when

actionable

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next